Utah statutes.
41-3-108.   Copies of records and papers -- Admissibility in evidence.

Certified copies of all records and papers prepared in the office of the administrator under seal of the administrator are admissible in evidence in any case in the same manner as the original.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session

